src/braille/thirdparty/liblouis/tables/ms-my-g2.ctb
# Letter R
prfword raba 1235-12
contraction rb
always rabaan 1235-12-12456
prfword rabakah 1235-12-126
always rabakan 1235-12-345
always rabaku 1235-12-13-136
prfword rabalah 1235-12-156
always rabamu 1235-12-134-136
always rabanya 1235-12-246-1
word beraba 12-15-1235-12
always berabaan 12-15-1235-12-12456
prfword berabakah 12-15-1235-12-126
always berabakan 12-15-1235-12-345
prfword berabalah 12-15-1235-12-156
always berabanya 12-15-1235-12-246-1
word teraba 2345-15-1235-12
always terabakan 2345-15-1235-12-345
always terabai 36-1-12-1-24
always rabukan 1235-1-12-136-345
prfword raca 1235-14
contraction rc
endword racakah 1235-14-126
always racaku 1235-14-13-136
endword racalah 1235-14-156
always racamu 1235-14-134-136
always racanya 1235-14-246-1
prfword rada 1235-145
contraction rd
always radaan 1235-145-12456
prfword radakah 1235-145-126
always radakan 1235-1-145-1-13-12456
always radaku 1235-145-13-136
prfword radalah 1235-145-156
always radamu 1235-145-134-136
always radanya 1235-145-246-1
always radukan 1235-1-145-136-345
prfword raga 1235-1245
contraction rg
always ragaan 1235-1245-12456
always ragai 1235-1245-24
prfword ragakah 1235-1245-126
always ragakan 1235-1245-345
always ragaku 1235-1245-13-136
prfword ragalah 1235-1245-156
always ragamu 1235-1245-134-136
always raganya 1235-1245-246-1
always ragawan 1235-1245-2456-12456
always ragawati 1235-1245-2456-1-2345-24
prfword beraga 12-15-1235-1245
prfword beragakah 12-15-1235-1245-126
always beragakan 12-15-1235-1245-345
prfword beragalah 12-15-1235-1245-156
prfword beraganya 12-15-1235-1245-246-1
always ragukan 1235-1-1245-136-345
word raha =
always berahsia 12-15-1235-1246-234-24-1
always berahsiakan 12-15-1235-1246-234-24-1-345
always raikan 1235-1-24-345
prfword raja 1235-245
contraction rj
always rajaan 1235-245-12456
always rajaankan 1235-245-12456-345
prfword rajakah 1235-245-126
word rajakan 1235-245-345
sufword rajaku 1235-245-13-136
prfword rajalah 1235-245-156
sufword rajamu 1235-245-134-136
always rajanya 1235-245-246-1
sufword rajani 1235-245-1345-24
word rajanikan 1235-245-1345-24-345
always rajawali 1235-245-2456-1-123-24
always rajawalikan 1235-245-2456-1-123-24-345
prfword beraja 12-15-1235-245
always berajaan 12-15-1235-245-12456
prfword berajakah 12-15-1235-245-126
always berajakan 23-1-245-1-13-12456
prfword berajalah 12-15-1235-245-156
always berajanya 12-15-1235-245-246-1
sufword dirajai 256-1235-245-24
always maharaja 134-125-1235-245
contraction mhrj
always maharajakan 134-125-1235-245-345
always maharajalela 134-125-1235-245-123-15-123-1
always maharajalelakan 134-125-1235-245-123-15-123-1-345
always merajalela 34-1235-245-123-15-123-1
always merajalelakan 34-1235-245-123-15-123-1-345
always nagaraja 1345-1245-1235-245
contraction ngrj
sufword rakan 1235-1-345
sufword serakan 1456-1235-1-345
always rakyat 5-1235
prfword rama 1235-134
contraction rm
always ramaan 1235-134-12456
prfword ramakah 1235-134-126
always ramakan 1235-134-345
always ramaku 1235-134-13-136
prfword ramalah 1235-134-156
always ramamu 1235-134-134-136
always ramanya 1235-134-246-1
always ramah 1235-1-134-1246
always ramahkan 1235-1-134-1246-345
prfword ramada 1235-134-145
contraction rmd
word ramai 1235
word ramaikah 1235-25-126
word ramaikan 1235-25-345
word ramailah 1235-25-156
word ramainya 1235-25-246-1
word beramai 12-15-25-1235
word beramaikah 12-15-25-1235-25-126
word beramailah 12-15-25-1235-25-156
always diramaikan 256-25-1235-25-345
always keramaian 235-25-1235-25-12456
always meramaikan 34-25-1235-25-345
always memperamaikan 34-134-1256-25-1235-25-345
word teramai 2345-15-25-1235
word teramaikah 2345-15-25-1235-25-126
word teramailah 2345-15-25-1235-25-156
always ramal =
always ramalkan 1235-1-134-1-123-345
always ramayana 1235-134-13456-1345
contraction rmyn
always ramikan 1235-1-134-24-345
prfword rana 1235-1345
contraction rn
always ranaan 1235-1345-12456
endword ranakah 1235-1345-126
always ranakan 1235-1345-345
always ranaku 1235-1345-13-136
endword ranalah 1235-1345-156
always ranamu 1235-1345-134-136
always rananya 1235-1345-246-1
always peterana 1256-2345-15-1235-1345
always ranah 1235-1-1345-1246
always rancang 45-1235
always rancangkan 45-1235-345
always berancang 12-15-45-1235
always berancangkan 12-15-45-1235-345
always perancang 1256-45-1235
always perancangkan 1256-45-1235-345
always terancang 2345-15-45-1235
always terancangkan 2345-15-45-1235-345
prfword rasa 1235-234
contraction rs
always rasaan 1235-234-12456
prfword rasai 1235-234-24
prfword rasaikah 1235-234-24-126
always rasaiku 1235-234-24-13-136
prfword rasailah 1235-234-24-156
always rasaimu 1235-234-24-134-136
always rasainya 1235-234-24-246-1
prfword rasakah 1235-234-126
always rasakan 1235-234-345
always rasaku 1235-234-13-136
prfword rasalah 1235-234-156
always rasamu 1235-234-134-136
always rasanya 1235-234-246-1
word berasa 12-15-1235-234
word berasakah 12-15-1235-234-126
word berasakan 12-15-1235-234-345
word berasalah 12-15-1235-234-156




always berasakan 12-15-1235-234-345
always perasan 1256-1235-1-234-12456
always perasankan 1256-1235-1-234-12456-345
always perasang 1256-1235-1-234-1-346
always perasangkan 1256-1235-1-234-1-346-345
always rasmikan 1235-1-234-134-24-345
prfword rata 1235-2345
contraction rt
always rataan 1235-2345-12456
sufword ratai 1235-2345-24
sufword diratai 256-1235-2345-24
sufword meratai 34-1235-2345-24
prfword ratakah 1235-2345-126
always ratakan 1235-2345-345
always rataku 1235-2345-13-136
prfword ratalah 1235-2345-156
always ratamu 1235-2345-134-136
always ratanya 1235-2345-246-1
word rawa 1235-2456
contraction rw
always rawala 1235-2456-123
contraction rwl
endword rawana 1235-2456-1345
contraction rwn
prfword raya 1235-13456
contraction ry
always rayaan 1235-13456-12456
always rayaankan 1235-13456-12456-345
always rayai 1235-13456-24
prfword rayakah 1235-13456-126
always rayakan 1235-13456-345
always rayaku 1235-13456-13-136
prfword rayalah 1235-13456-156
always rayamu 1235-13456-134-136
always rayanya 1235-13456-246-1
always beraya 12-15-1235-13456
always berayakan 12-15-1235-13456-345
always berayau 12-15-1235-1-13456-1-136
always merayau 34-1235-1-13456-1-136
always perayau 1256-1235-1-13456-1-136
always rayau =
word rebana 1235-15-12-1345
prfword rebanakah 1235-15-12-1345-126
always rebanakan 1235-15-12-1345-345
always rebanaku 1235-15-12-1345-13-136
prfword rebanalah 1235-15-12-1345-156
always rebanamu 1235-15-12-1345-134-136
always rebananya 1235-15-12-1345-246-1
always rekakan 1235-15-13-1-345
always relah 1235-15-156
always relahkan 1235-15-156-345
always relakan 1235-15-123-1-345
always remaja 1235-15-134-245
always remajakan 1235-15-134-245-345
always berencana 12-15-1235-26-14-1345
always berencanakan 12-15-1235-26-14-1345-345
always rentakan 1235-26-2345-1-13-12456
always rentikan 1235-26-2345-24-345
always restukan 1235-15-234-2345-136-345
always berestu 12-15-1235-15-234-2345-136
always berestukan 12-15-1235-15-234-2345-136-345
always ribukan 1235-24-12-136-345
midendword ridan 1235-24-145-12456
always rkang 1235-13-1-346
always rodakan 1235-135-145-1-345
always rohani =
always rohanikan 1235-135-125-1-1345-24-345
always romakan 1235-135-134-1-345
always ronggakan 1235-135-346-1245-1-345
always rotikan 1235-135-2345-24-345
always rugikan 1235-136-1245-24-345
always runding 1235-136-1345-256-346
always rundingkan 1235-136-1345-256-346-345
always perunding 1256-1235-136-1345-256-346
prfword rupa 456-1235
always rupaan 456-1235-12456
always rupai 456-1235-24
prfword rupakah 456-1235-126
always rupakan 456-1235-345
always rupaku 456-1235-13-136
prfword rupalah 456-1235-156
always rupamu 456-1235-134-136
always rupanya 456-1235-246-1
always rupawan 456-1235-2456-12456
always berupa 12-15-456-1235
always berupakan 12-15-456-1235-345
always rusakan 1235-136-234-1-345
